portugues.aff
flag *Y:              # "CAT=v,T=inf"  # Deve ser posta nos verbos regulares
A R     >  -R,VA        # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pi"
A R     >  -R,VAS       # "P=2,N=s,T=pi"
A R     >  -AR,ÁVAMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=pi"
A R     >  -AR,ÁVEIS    # "P=2,N=p,T=pi"
A R     >  -R,VAM       # "P=3,N=p,T=pi"
[^CÇG] A R >  -AR,EI    # "P=1,N=s,T=pp"
C A R   >  -CAR,QUEI    # "P=1,N=s,T=pp"
G A R   >  -GAR,GUEI    # "P=1,N=s,T=pp"
Ç A R  >  -ÇAR,CEI      # "P=1,N=s,T=pp"
A R     >  -R,STE       # "P=2,N=s,T=pp"
A R     >  -AR,OU       # "P=3,N=s,T=pp"
A R     >  -AR,ÁMOS     # "P=1,N=p,T=pp"
A R     >  -R,STES      # "P=2,N=p,T=pp"
A R     >  AM           # "P=3,N=p,T=pp"
A R     >  A            # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp"
A R     >  AS           # "P=2,N=s,T=pmp"
A R     >  -AR,ÁRAMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=pmp"
A R     >  -AR,ÁREIS    # "P=2,N=p,T=pmp"
A R     >  EI           # "P=1,N=s,T=f"
A R     >  ÁS           # "P=2,N=s,T=f"
A R     >  Á            # "P=3,N=s,T=f"
A R     >  EMOS         # "P=1,N=p,T=f"
A R     >  EIS          # "P=2,N=p,T=f"
A R     >  ÃO           # "P=3,N=p,T=f"
A R     >  -R,SSE       # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pic"
A R     >  -R,SSES      # "P=2,N=s,T=pic"
A R     >  -AR,ÁSSEMOS  # "P=1,N=p,T=pic"
A R     >  -AR,ÁSSEIS   # "P=2,N=p,T=pic"
A R     >  -R,SSEM      # "P=3,N=p,T=pic"
A R     >  ES           # "P=2,N=s,T=fc"
A R     >  MOS          # "P=1,N=p,T=fc"
A R     >  DES          # "P=2,N=p,T=fc"
A R     >  EM           # "P=3,N=p,T=fc"
A R     >  IA           # "P=1_3,N=s,T=c"
A R     >  IAS          # "P=2,N=s,T=c"
A R     >  ÍAMOS        # "P=1,N=p,T=c"
A R     >  ÍEIS         # "P=2,N=p,T=c"
A R     >  IAM          # "P=3,N=p,T=c"
A R     >  -R,NDO       # "T=g"
A R     >  -R,DO        # "G=m,N=s,T=ppa"
A R     >  -R,DA        # "G=f,N=s,T=ppa"
A R     >  -R,DOS       # "G=m,N=p,T=ppa"
A R     >  -R,DAS       # "G=f,N=p,T=ppa"
E R     >  -ER,IA       # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pi"
E R     >  -ER,IAS      # "P=2,N=s,T=pi"
E R     >  -ER,ÍAMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=pi"
E R     >  -ER,ÍEIS     # "P=2,N=p,T=pi"
E R     >  -ER,IAM      # "P=3,N=p,T=pi"
E R     >  -ER,I        # "P=1,N=s,T=pp"
E R     >  -R,STE       # "P=2,N=s,T=pp"
E R     >  -R,U         # "P=3,N=s,T=pp"
E R     >  -R,MOS       # "P=1,N=p,T=pp"
E R     >  -R,STES      # "P=2,N=p,T=pp"
E R     >  AM           # "P=3,N=p,T=pp"
E R     >  A            # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp"
E R     >  AS           # "P=2,N=s,T=pmp"
E R     >  -ER,ÊRAMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=pmp"
E R     >  -ER,ÊREIS    # "P=2,N=p,T=pmp"
E R     >  EI           # "P=1,N=s,T=f"
E R     >  ÁS           # "P=2,N=s,T=f"
E R     >  Á            # "P=3,N=s,T=f"
E R     >  EMOS         # "P=1,N=p,T=f"
E R     >  EIS          # "P=2,N=p,T=f"
E R     >  ÃO           # "P=3,N=p,T=f"
E R     >  -R,SSE       # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pic"
E R     >  -R,SSES      # "P=2,N=s,T=pic"
E R     >  -ER,ÊSSEMOS  # "P=1,N=p,T=pic"
E R     >  -ER,ÊSSEIS   # "P=2,N=p,T=pic"
E R     >  -R,SSEM      # "P=3,N=p,T=pic"
E R     >  ES           # "P=2,N=s,T=fc"
E R     >  MOS          # "P=1,N=p,T=fc"
E R     >  DES          # "P=2,N=p,T=fc"
E R     >  EM           # "P=3,N=p,T=fc"
E R     >  IA           # "P=1_3,N=s,T=c"
E R     >  IAS          # "P=2,N=s,T=c"
E R     >  ÍAMOS        # "P=1,N=p,T=c"
E R     >  ÍEIS         # "P=2,N=p,T=c"
E R     >  IAM          # "P=3,N=p,T=c"
E R     >  -R,NDO       # "T=g"
E R     >  -ER,IDO      # "G=m,N=s,T=ppa"
E R     >  -ER,IDA      # "G=f,N=s,T=ppa"
E R     >  -ER,IDOS     # "G=m,N=p,T=ppa"
E R     >  -ER,IDAS     # "G=f,N=p,T=ppa"
C R E V E R     >  -EVER,ITO      # "G=m,N=s,T=ppa"
C R E V E R     >  -EVER,ITA      # "G=f,N=s,T=ppa"
C R E V E R     >  -EVER,ITOS     # "G=m,N=p,T=ppa"
C R E V E R     >  -EVER,ITAS     # "G=f,N=p,T=ppa"
I R     >  -R,A         # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pi"
I R     >  -R,AS        # "P=2,N=s,T=pi"
I R     >  -IR,ÍAMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=pi"
I R     >  -IR,ÍEIS     # "P=2,N=p,T=pi"
I R     >  -R,AM        # "P=3,N=p,T=pi"
I R     >  -IR,I        # "P=1,N=s,T=pp"
I R     >  -R,STE       # "P=2,N=s,T=pp"
I R     >  -R,U         # "P=3,N=s,T=pp"
I R     >  -R,MOS       # "P=1,N=p,T=pp"
I R     >  -R,STES      # "P=2,N=p,T=pp"
I R     >  AM           # "P=3,N=p,T=pp"
I R     >  A            # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp"
I R     >  AS           # "P=2,N=s,T=pmp"
I R     >  -IR,ÍRAMOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=pmp"
I R     >  -IR,ÍREIS    # "P=2,N=p,T=pmp"
I R     >  EI           # "P=1,N=s,T=f"
I R     >  ÁS           # "P=2,N=s,T=f"
I R     >  Á            # "P=3,N=s,T=f"
I R     >  EMOS         # "P=1,N=p,T=f"
I R     >  EIS          # "P=2,N=p,T=f"
I R     >  ÃO           # "P=3,N=p,T=f"
I R     >  -R,SSE       # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pic"
I R     >  -R,SSES      # "P=2,N=s,T=pic"
I R     >  -IR,ÍSSEMOS  # "P=1,N=p,T=pic"
I R     >  -IR,ÍSSEIS   # "P=2,N=p,T=pic"
I R     >  -R,SSEM      # "P=3,N=p,T=pic"
I R     >  ES           # "P=2,N=s,T=fc"
I R     >  MOS          # "P=1,N=p,T=fc"
I R     >  DES          # "P=2,N=p,T=fc"
I R     >  EM           # "P=3,N=p,T=fc"
I R     >  IA           # "P=1_3,N=s,T=c"
I R     >  IAS          # "P=2,N=s,T=c"
I R     >  ÍAMOS        # "P=1,N=p,T=c"
I R     >  ÍEIS         # "P=2,N=p,T=c"
I R     >  IAM          # "P=3,N=p,T=c"
I R     >  -R,NDO       # "T=g"
I R     >  -R,DO        # "G=m,N=s,T=ppa"
I R     >  -R,DA        # "G=f,N=s,T=ppa"
I R     >  -R,DOS       # "G=m,N=p,T=ppa"
I R     >  -R,DAS       # "G=f,N=p,T=ppa"
A R > -AR,Á
E R > -ER,Ê
flag *Z:                # "CAT=v,T=inf" #(p,Pc,I) Irregulares (frequente erir)
E R I R     >   -ERIR,IRO    # "P=1,N=s,T=p"
E R I R     >   -IR,ES       # "P=2,N=s,T=p"   #REG.
E R I R     >   -IR,E        # "P=3,N=s,T=p"   #REG.
E R I R     >   -R,MOS       # "P=1,N=p,T=p"   #REG.
E R I R     >   -R,S         # "P=2,N=p,T=p"   #REG.
E R I R     >   -IR,EM       # "P=3,N=p,T=p"   #REG.
E R I R     >   -ERIR,IRA    # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pc"
E R I R     >   -ERIR,IRAS   # "P=2,N=s,T=pc"
E R I R     >   -ERIR,IRAMOS # "P=1,N=p,T=pc"
E R I R     >   -ERIR,IRAIS  # "P=2,N=p,T=pc"
E R I R     >   -ERIR,IRAM   # "P=3,N=p,T=pc"
E A R       >   -AR,IO   # "P=1,N=s,T=p"
E A R       >   -AR,IAS  # "P=2,N=s,T=p"
E A R       >   -AR,IA   # "P=3,N=s,T=p"
E A R       >   -R,MOS   # "P=1,N=p,T=p"   #REG.
E A R       >   -R,IS    # "P=2,N=p,T=p"   #REG.
E A R       >   -AR,IAM  # "P=3,N=p,T=p"
E A R       >   -AR,IE   # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pc"
E A R       >   -AR,IES  # "P=2,N=s,T=pc"
E A R       >   -AR,EMOS # "P=1,N=p,T=pc"   #REG.
E A R       >   -AR,EIS  # "P=2,N=p,T=pc"   #REG.
E A R       >   -AR,IEM  # "P=3,N=p,T=pc"
E A R       >   -AR,AI   # "P=2,N=p,T=i"   #REG.
E A R       >   -AR,IEM  # "P=3,N=p,T=i"
U Z I R     >  -IR,O       # "P=1,N=s,T=p"   #REG.
U Z I R     >  -IR,ES      # "P=2,N=s,T=p"   #REG.
U Z I R     >  -ZIR,Z      # "P=3,N=s,T=p"
U Z I R     >  -R,MOS      # "P=1,N=p,T=p"   #REG.
U Z I R     >  -R,S        # "P=2,N=p,T=p"   #REG.
U Z I R     >  -IR,EM      # "P=3,N=p,T=p"   #REG.
U Z I R     >  -IR,A       # "P=1_3,N=s,T=pc"   #REG.
U Z I R     >  -IR,AS      # "P=2,N=s,T=pc"   #REG.
U Z I R     >  -IR,AMOS    # "P=1,N=p,T=pc"   #REG.
U Z I R     >  -IR,AIS     # "P=2,N=p,T=pc"   #REG.
U Z I R     >  -IR,AM      # "P=3,N=p,T=pc"   #REG.
U Z I R     >  -IR,I       # "P=2,N=p,T=i"   #REG.
A R > -AR,Á
E R > -ER,Ê
